Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1505
Community college area; body corporate.

Each community college area shall constitute a body corporate and as such may sue and be sued.

Laws 1975, LB 344, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 79-2639;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 27.

Chapter 79, article 26, the Technical Community College Area Act, is not in violation of Article VIII, section 1A, of the Constitution. State ex rel. Western Technical Com. Col. Area v. Tallon, 196 Neb. 603, 244 N.W.2d 183 (1976).